Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-130
Special tax; fund.

Money raised by the county board pursuant to the provisions of sections 23-119 to 23-129 is specially appropriated and constituted a fund, distinct from all others, in the hands of the county treasurer, until the obligation assumed be discharged.

Laws 1879, § 31, p. 364;

R.S.1913, § 960;

C.S.1922, § 860;

C.S.1929, § 26-114;

R.S.1943, § 23-130.